Utah statutes.
72-9-503.   Authority to enter agreement with other states for joint port-of-entry operation.

(1)  The executive director of  the department may negotiate and enter into bilateral agreements with a representative designated by a contiguous state for the construction, operation, maintenance, and staffing of a jointly occupied port-of-entry.

(2)  The agreement may provide for the collection of highway user fees, registration fees, permit fees, fuel taxes, and any other fees and taxes by either state jointly occupying a port-of-entry.

(3)  The agreement may provide for the  enforcement of state and federal laws as provided in this chapter.

